Washington statutes.
RCW 40.14.022

Division of archives and records management—Imaging account.

The imaging account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts collected under RCW 40.14.020(8) for contract imaging, micrographics, reproduction, and duplication services provided by the division of archives and records management must be deposited into the account, and expenditures from the account may be used only for these purposes. Only the secretary of state or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2003 c 163 s 2.]